Utah statutes.
77-30-20.   Governor not to inquire into guilt or innocence.

The guilt or innocence of the accused as to the crime of which he is charged in another state may not be inquired into by the governor or in any proceeding after the demand for extradition accompanied by a charge of crime in legal form as above provided shall have been presented to the governor, except as it may be involved in identifying the person held as the person charged with the crime.



Enacted by Chapter 15, 1980 General Session

